District of Columbia statutes.
1-624.07

Repealed

Abolishment of positions for Fiscal Year 1997.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2407
as added Sept. 9, 1996, 110 Stat. 2372, Pub. L. 104-194, § 140(b)
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-200 § 2, 43 DCR 5427
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 57, 44 DCR 1271
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(x)(2), 45 DCR 2464

Applicability of § 101(x) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-624.01.

D.C. Law 12-124, Title IV, § 401(a), as amended by D.C. Law 12-264, § 60 ( 46 DCR 2118), eff. April 20, 1999, provided:

“Sec. 401. (a) Section 101(d), (k), (p), (s), and (x) of this act shall apply upon the enactment of legislation by the United States Congress that states the following:

“Notwithstanding any other law, section 101(d), (k), (p), (s), and (x) of the Omnibus Personnel Reform Amendment Act of 1998, effective June 10, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-124; 45 DCR 2464) are enacted into law.”

Pub. L. 105-277, Div. C, Title I, § 134, Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2681-596, provided: “Sec. 134. Notwithstanding any other law, sections 101(d), (k), (p), (s) and (x) of the Omnibus Personnel Reform Amendment Act of 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, effective June 11, 1998, are enacted into law.”

1981 Ed., § 1-625.5.